Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,206
Application for injunction.

The Attorney General, acting on behalf of the State Fire Marshal, or the county attorney in a county in which an amusement ride is located or operated may apply to the district court, pursuant to the rules of civil procedure, for an order enjoining operation of any amusement ride operated in violation of the Nebraska Amusement Ride Act.

Laws 1987, LB 226, § 17;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-1817;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 42.